Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2189.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Licensed health aides; scope of practice; rules; definition A. On or before October 1, 2026, the Arizona state board of nursing shall adopt rules to implement the scope of practice for licensed health aides as defined in section 32-1601, Arizona Revised Statutes. The rules shall address at least the following: 1. Updated standards for licensed health aide training programs, including curriculum and training and eligibility requirements for licensed health aides, including specific requirements for licensed health aides to perform routine ventilator care. 2. Required documentation from a licensed medical provider attesting that a singular patient is suitable for licensed health aide-level care in order for a licensed health aide training program to allow a person to participate in the program's curriculum, competency examination and training. 3. An updated definition of family member. 4. Standards of conduct specific for licensed health aides that take into consideration the circumstances of caring for a family member. 5. A discipline process for a licensed health aide who acts outside of the standards of conduct, including providing care outside of their trained competencies related to the health care needs of the individual patient for whom the licensed health aide provides care. 6. A process to collect aggregated annual data on the use of and outcomes associated with licensed health aides in this state. 7. A definition of routine ventilator care. B. For the purposes of this section, "licensed medical provider" means a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17, Arizona Revised Statutes, a nurse practitioner who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15, Arizona Revised Statutes, or a physician assistant who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 25, Arizona Revised Statutes. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.